schwaebisch.aff
FLAG num
# Nouns that refer to languages (auf Englisch, em Englischa, ens Englische)
SFX 2800 Y 2
SFX 2800   0        a           .
SFX 2800   0        e           .





####################################################################################################################
# Adjectives - Eigenschaftswörter (Adjektive) 3FNN
# 3: suffix for adjectives
# F: flag, whereby 0 corresponds to the case that the adjective is regular, 1 means either a) the plural does not 
#  exist semantically or b) is unregular 2 means the singular does not exist (should rarely be the case), 3 all 
#  other cases 
# NN: enumeration
#
# Generally speaking, the negations (built with "o" as a prefix) are listed in the dic file separately
####################################################################################################################
####################################################################################################################


# adjectives regular, including comparative & superlative degrees and including negation (Eigenschaftswörter regulär)
# this also includes nationalities, e.g. deutsch, britisch, europäisch, etc.
SFX 3001 Y 13
SFX 3001   0       0            .
SFX 3001   0       a            .
SFX 3001   0       am           .
SFX 3001   0       e            .
SFX 3001   0       s            .
SFX 3001   0       er           .
SFX 3001   0       ere          .
SFX 3001   0       era          .
SFX 3001   0       ers          .
SFX 3001   0       ste          .
SFX 3001   0       sta          .
SFX 3001   0       sts          .
SFX 3001   0       ster         .


# adjectives regular, including comparative & superlative degrees and including negation (Eigenschaftswörter, die auf "a", "d", "s", oder "x" enden)
SFX 3002 Y 25
SFX 3002   0       0            .
SFX 3002   0       a            [^a]
SFX 3002   a       ena          a
SFX 3002   0       am           [^a]
SFX 3002   a       enam         a
SFX 3002   0       e            [^a]
SFX 3002   a       ene          a
SFX 3002   a       es           [^s]
SFX 3002   0       es           s
SFX 3002   0       er           [^a]
SFX 3002   a       ener         a
SFX 3002   0       ere          [^a]
SFX 3002   0       nere         a
SFX 3002   0       era          [^a]
SFX 3002   0       nera         a
SFX 3002   0       ers          [^a]
SFX 3002   0       ners         a
SFX 3002   0       este         [^a]
SFX 3002   a       este         a
SFX 3002   0       esta         [^a]
SFX 3002   a       esta         a
SFX 3002   0       estas        [^a]
SFX 3002   a       estas        a
SFX 3002   0       ester        [^a]
SFX 3002   a       ester        a


# adjectives that end by "t", including comparative & superlative degrees and including negation (Eigenschaftswörter, die auf  "t" enden und regulär sind, 20=t)
SFX 3020 Y 12
SFX 3020   0       a            .
SFX 3020   0       am           .
SFX 3020   0       e            .
SFX 3020   0       s            .
SFX 3020   0       er           .
SFX 3020   0       ere          .
SFX 3020   0       era          .
SFX 3020   0       ers          .
SFX 3020   0       este         .
SFX 3020   0       esta         .
SFX 3020   0       estas        .
SFX 3020   0       ester        .







# adjectives regular, including comparative & superlative degrees and including negation (Eigenschaftswörter, die auf "el" enden und regulär sind)
SFX 3003 Y 12
SFX 3003   el      la           .
SFX 3003   el      lam          .
SFX 3003   el      le           .
SFX 3003   0       s            .
SFX 3003   el      ler          .
SFX 3003   el      lere         .
SFX 3003   el      lera         .
SFX 3003   el      lers         .
SFX 3003   0       ste          .
SFX 3003   0       sta          .
SFX 3003   0       stas         .
SFX 3003   0       ster         .


# adjectives without comparative & superlative degrees (Eigenschaftswörter die "einzahlig", also nicht steigerbar sind bzw. es keine Mehrzahlform gibt), the plural either (1) does not exist semantically or (2) is unregular
# examples: zwôestimmig (Musikinstrument), warm, benannt
SFX 3104 Y 6
SFX 3104   0       a            .
SFX 3104   0       am           .
SFX 3104   0       e            .
SFX 3104   0       s            [^sx]
SFX 3104   0       as           [sx]      # jedas should be recognized here
SFX 3104   0       er           .


# building superlative degrees of adjectives in comparative form (Eigenschaftswörter Mehrzahl), either (1) the singular is unregular or (2) the singular does not exist (should rarely be the case)
# Examples: wärmer, später
SFX 3205 Y 8
SFX 3205   0       a            .        # examples of first case: letzt
SFX 3205   0       er           .
SFX 3205   0       e            .
SFX 3205   0       s            .
SFX 3205   er      sta          .
SFX 3205   er      ste          .
SFX 3205   er      sts          .
SFX 3205   er      ster         .


# plural form of irregular adjectives (Eigenschaftswörter unregelmäßig  Mehrzahl), only comparative & superlative degrees, either (1) the singular is unregular or (2) the singular does not exist (should rarely be the case)
SFX 3206 Y 7
SFX 3206   0       a            .
SFX 3206   0       er           .
SFX 3206   0       e            .
SFX 3206   0       s            .
SFX 3206   er      este         .
SFX 3206   er      esta         .
SFX 3206   er      estas        .



####################################################################################################################
# Prefixes for adjectives - Präfixe für Eigenschaftswörter 3NNNN
# 3: prefix for adjectives
# NNNN: enumeration
# More prefixes (may be added in future versions): "inter", "außer", "graoß", "gleich"
####################################################################################################################

PFX 30001 Y 1
PFX 30001   0       o          .
PFX 30101 Y 1
PFX 30101   0       äller      .

####################################################################################################################
# Pronouns - Fürwörter (Pronomen) 4NNN
# 4: suffix for pronouns
# NNN: enumeration
####################################################################################################################


# Possesive pronouns (Fürwörter besitzanzeigend, Possesivpronomen) - note that "euer" is defined separately
SFX 4001 Y 9
SFX 4001    0       m           [^r]
SFX 4001    0       am          r
SFX 4001    0       n           [^r]
SFX 4001    0       an          r
SFX 4001    0       s           .
SFX 4001    0       ne          [^r]
SFX 4001    0       e           r
SFX 4001    0       ner         [^r]
SFX 4001    0       er          r


# Indefinite pronouns (Fürwörter unbekannt, Indefinitpronomen)
# example: welche
SFX 4002 Y 3
SFX 4002    0       e           .
SFX 4002    0       er          .
SFX 4002    0       as          .







##############################################################################################################
# The following flags only have a semantical meaning
# 
# 1: undefined (but not a noun)
# 2: two words connected with a ' - examples: he'mr, ischd's, sich's
# 44444: Prefixes for verbs added (4=d=done)
# 88: KEEPCASE: lower and upper case must not be changed
# 99: number (Zahl) - compunds of numbers (to be defined)
# 110: conjunctions (Konjunktionen bzw. Bindewörter), examples: weil, drmit
# 140: adverbs (Adverbien, 1=a,4=d)
# 160: preposition (Verhältniswort)
# 1100: past tense of a word (Tunwort Vergangenheitsform) - it will be used in the future for compounds
# 1200: Tunwort irregulär - irregular verbs
# 1203: irregular conjunctive construction
# 1300: (Tunwort dummy) words that are marked as verbs for development purposes
# 1400: Tunwort nicht definiert - non-defined verb, it seems like we could setup some new rules
# 1900: Tunwort indirekter Infinitiv (Extended infinitive); 9="i"; examples: aufzweisa, aufzomweisa, weiterzomganga
# 2900: Einzahl irregulär - refers to a singular form of a noun, the plural is irregular.
# 2901: Einzahl irregulär - refers to a singular form of a noun, the plural does not exist semantically
# 2902: Mehrzahl irregulär - irregular plural forms of nouns; this corresponds either to (1) semantically, only the plural form makes sense, or (2) the singular and the plural version differ in an irregular way
# 2903: Mehrzahl irregulär - irregular plural forms of nouns; this corresponds to the case where both, singular and plurar are the same
# 2912: Nåma - names (can be persons, countries, cities, rivers, etc.)
# 2988: UNBEKANNTES NOMEN - unknown (or not yet defined)
# 3300: irregular adjectives (Eigenschaftswörter irregulär)
# 3301: (Eigenschaftwort Dummy) - used for development purposes
# 3302: (Eigenschaftswort Unbekannt) - not yet defined
# 3310: adjectives as "Partizip 1" (Adjektive, die von Tunwörtern herstammen; development state; soll irgendwann mit 1100 kombiniert werden)
# 3320: adjectives as "Partizip 2" (Adjektive, die von Tunwörtern herstammen; development state; soll irgendwann mit 1100 kombiniert werden)
# 4040: irregular pronoun
# 4088: unknown pronoun (unbekanntes pronomen) - may refer to the case where only one form exists
#
# TODO: check 2900, 2901 2902 and 2903 (alle vor Version 02.02.11)
